Missouri, session 2026, SB1549.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 536.016, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
536.016 and 536.340, to read as follows:
536.016. 1. Any state agency shall propose rules
based upon substantial evidence on the record and a finding
by the agency that the rule is specifically authorized by a
statute and necessary to carry out the purposes of the
statute that granted such rulemaking authority. A state
agency shall not rely on a general grant of rulemaking
authority to supplement a specific grant of rulemaking
authority and shall not rely on a specific grant of
rulemaking authority to adopt a rule that exceeds or expands
the subject matter expressly authorized in the statute
granting such authority.
2. Each state agency shall adopt procedures by which
it will determine whether a rule is necessary to carry out
the purposes of the statute authorizing the rule. Such
criteria and rulemaking shall be based upon reasonably
available empirical data and shall include an assessment of
the effectiveness and the cost of rules both to the state

SB 1549 2
and to any private or public person or entity affected by
such rules.
3. Each state agency shall make publicly available
proposed rules on the home page of its official internet
website by providing a hyperlink entitled "proposed rules".
This hyperlink shall grant access to an internet page which
shall provide the following information for each proposed
rule within one business day of when such rule is published
in the Missouri Register:
(1) The text of the proposed rule as filed with the
secretary of state pursuant to section 536.021, including
any fiscal notes;
(2) A summary which shall be a concise statement not
exceeding one hundred words using language neither
intentionally argumentative nor likely to create prejudice
either for or against the proposed rule; and
(3) A direct hyperlink to the full text of the
proposed rule located in the Missouri Register and all
material incorporated by reference on the secretary of
state's website.
536.340. 1. As used in this section, the term
"substantive policy statement" shall mean a written
expression that informs the public of a state agency's
current interpretation of, or opinion concerning, the
requirements of the federal or Missouri constitution, a
federal or state statute, an administrative rule or
regulation, or a final judgment of a court of competent
jurisdiction. The term shall include the state agency's
current practice, procedure, or method of action based on
that interpretation or opinion.
2. A state agency shall post all substantive policy
statements on its publicly accessible website and maintain a

SB 1549 3
complete and current record of such statements for public
inspection.
✓